Utah statutes.
39-6-43.   Sworn testimony -- Read in evidence.

(1)  The sworn testimony of a case which is contained in the authenticated record of proceedings of a court of inquiry, of a person whose oral testimony cannot be obtained, may be read in evidence by any party before a military court if:

(a)  otherwise admissible under the rules of evidence;

(b)  the accused was a party before the court of inquiry;

(c)  the same issue was involved or the accused consents to the introduction of the evidence; or

(d)  the accused was physically present when the testimony was taken.

(2)  The testimony may be read in evidence:

(a)  before a court of inquiry or a military board; or

(b)  by the defense only in cases extending to the dismissal of a commissioned officer.

